Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.030

Administrative law judges—Appointment and contractual basis—Clerical personnel—Discipline and termination of administrative law judges—Civil service—Rules for operation of office.

(1) The chief administrative law judge shall appoint administrative law judges to fulfill the duties prescribed in this chapter. All administrative law judges shall have a demonstrated knowledge of administrative law and procedures. The chief administrative law judge may establish different levels of administrative law judge positions.

(2) The chief administrative law judge may also contract with qualified individuals to serve as administrative law judges for specified hearings. Such individuals shall be compensated for their services on a contractual basis for each hearing, in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW. The chief administrative law judge may not contract with any individual who is at that time an employee of the state.

(3) The chief administrative law judge may appoint such clerical and other specialized or technical personnel as may be necessary to carry on the work of this chapter.

(4) Subject to any collective bargaining agreement, the administrative law judges appointed under subsection (1) of this section are subject to discipline and termination, for cause, by the chief administrative law judge. Upon written request by the person so disciplined or terminated, the chief administrative law judge shall forthwith put the reasons for such action in writing. The person affected has a right of review by the superior court of Thurston county on petition for reinstatement or other remedy filed within thirty days of receipt of such written reasons.

(5) All employees of the office except the chief administrative law judge and the administrative law judges are subject to chapter 41.06 RCW.

(6) Administrative law judges appointed under subsection (1) of this section have the right to collectively bargain under chapter 41.80 RCW, regardless of their exemption from chapter 41.06 RCW.

(7) The office may adopt rules for its own operation and in furtherance of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2020 c 77 s 5; 1981 c 67 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 77: See notes following RCW 41.80.410.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.